District of Columbia statutes.
32-331

Establishment of the Rehabilitation Services Program.

(a)

There is established a Rehabilitation Services Program that shall provide comprehensive, coordinated, efficient, and accountable federally subsidized services to individuals with disabilities, including individuals with significant disabilities, to assist those individuals in achieving gainful employment in accordance with the requirements of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, approved August 7, 1998 (112 Stat. 1116; 29 U.S.C. § 720 et seq.).

(b)

The Mayor shall establish an economic needs test to be used in determining the ability of applicants for and recipients of vocational rehabilitation services to contribute to the payment of the costs of the vocational rehabilitation services.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-332, § 2, 52 DCR 1989

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-761.05.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-138, May 21, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 5055).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-290, April 4, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 5848).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-99, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3619).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-250, March 17, 2003, law notification 52 DCR 4126).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-284, February 25, 2002, 49 DCR 2311).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Second Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-596, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 650).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-72, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3612).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-235, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10737).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-358, February 19, 2004, 51 DCR 2576).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-559, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10378).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Rehabilitation Services Program Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-9, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2694).